apertium-zul.zul-tags.lexd
PATTERNS
MaybeSubjStem WB
ObjStem WB

# lsx-comp fails if it can't find all 3 word-boundary symbols
# so insert the ones we don't use
[<$_><$->:<$_><$->] # @HACK

LEXICON WB
<$>

PATTERN ObjStem
:ObjClass :ObjNum FixedStem ObjClass: ObjNum:

PATTERN MaybeSubjStem
ObjStem
:SubjClass :SubjNum (ObjStem|FixedStem) SubjClass: SubjNum:

PATTERN FixedStem
[<ANY_CHAR>]+ [<ANY_TAG>]+

LEXICON SubjClass
<s_p1>
<s_p2>
<s_p3>
<s_cl1-2>
<s_cl1-2a>
<s_cl3-4>
<s_cl5-6>
<s_cl7-8>
<s_cl9-10>
<s_cl11-10>
<s_cl14>
<s_cl15>
<s_cl17>

LEXICON SubjNum
<s_sg>
<s_pl>

LEXICON ObjClass
<o_p1>
<o_p2>
<o_p3>
<o_cl1-2>
<o_cl1-2a>
<o_cl3-4>
<o_cl5-6>
<o_cl7-8>
<o_cl9-10>
<o_cl11-10>
<o_cl14>
<o_cl15>
<o_cl17>

LEXICON ObjNum
<o_sg>
<o_pl>
